Florida, session 2026, SB1190.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (b) through (h) of subsection 14 (1) of section 1003.26, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 15 paragraphs (c) through (i), respectively, a new paragraph (b) is 16 added to that subsection, and paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of 17 that section is amended, to read: 18 1003.26âEnforcement of school attendance.âThe Legislature 19 finds that poor academic performance is associated with 20 nonattendance and that school districts must take an active role 21 in promoting and enforcing attendance as a means of improving 22 student performance. It is the policy of the state that each 23 district school superintendent be responsible for enforcing 24 school attendance of all students subject to the compulsory 25 school age in the school district and supporting enforcement of 26 school attendance by local law enforcement agencies. The 27 responsibility includes recommending policies and procedures to 28 the district school board that require public schools to respond 29 in a timely manner to every unexcused absence, and every absence 30 for which the reason is unknown, of students enrolled in the 31 schools. District school board policies shall require the parent 32 of a student to justify each absence of the student, and that 33 justification will be evaluated based on adopted district school 34 board policies that define excused and unexcused absences. The 35 policies must provide that public schools track excused and 36 unexcused absences and contact the home in the case of an 37 unexcused absence from school, or an absence from school for 38 which the reason is unknown, to prevent the development of 39 patterns of nonattendance. The Legislature finds that early 40 intervention in school attendance is the most effective way of 41 producing good attendance habits that will lead to improved 42 student learning and achievement. Each public school is required 43 to implement the following steps to promote and enforce regular 44 school attendance: 45 (1)âCONTACT, REFER, AND ENFORCE.â 46 (b)âTo support the timely communication and intervention 47 for students with absences, each district school board shall 48 implement a mandatory electronic alert system within its data 49 management system or educational platform to notify school 50 administrators, the child study team, and a studentâs parent 51 when a student reaches the school districtâs truancy threshold 52 for absences. 53 (2)âGIVE WRITTEN NOTICE.â 54 (a)âUnder the direction of the district school 55 superintendent, a designated school representative must provide 56 written notice in person or by return-receipt mail to the 57 parent, requiring the childâs enrollment or attendance within 3 58 days after the date of notice, when no valid reason is found for 59 a studentâs nonenrollment in school if the child is under 60 compulsory education requirements, and is not exempt. If the 61 child is not enrolled or in attendance in school within 3 days 62 after the notice being provided, the designated school 63 representative must report the case to the district school 64 superintendent, who must refer the case to the child study team 65 in paragraph (1)(c) (1)(b) at the school the student would be 66 assigned according to district school board attendance area 67 policies. In addition, the designated school representative may 68 refer the case to the Department of Juvenile Justiceâs 69 authorized agent for families in need of services. The child 70 study team must diligently facilitate intervention services and 71 report the case back to the district school superintendent 72 within 15 days after referral of the case if reasonable efforts 73 to resolve the nonenrollment behavior have been made and the 74 child is still not attending school. If the parent refuses to 75 cooperate or enroll the child in school within 15 days after 76 referral of the case to the child study team, the district 77 school superintendent must make a report to law enforcement and 78 refer the case to the Office of the State Attorney to bring 79 criminal prosecution against the parent. 80 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 984.151, Florida 81 Statutes, is amended to read: 82 984.151âEarly truancy intervention; truancy petition; 83 judgment.â 84 (1)âIf the school determines that a student subject to 85 compulsory school attendance has had at least 5 five unexcused 86 absences, or absences for which the reasons are unknown, within 87 a calendar month or 10 unexcused absences, or absences for which 88 the reasons are unknown, within a 90-calendar-day period 89 pursuant to s. 1003.26(1)(c) s. 1003.26(1)(b), or has had more 90 than 15 unexcused absences in a 90-calendar-day period, the 91 superintendent of schools or his or her designee may file a 92 truancy petition seeking early truancy intervention. 93 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 94 1003.02, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 95 1003.02âDistrict school board operation and control of 96 public K-12 education within the school district.âAs provided in 97 part II of chapter 1001, district school boards are 98 constitutionally and statutorily charged with the operation and 99 control of public K-12 education within their school districts. 100 The district school boards must establish, organize, and operate 101 their public K-12 schools and educational programs, employees, 102 and facilities. Their responsibilities include staff 103 development, public K-12 school student education including 104 education for exceptional students and students in juvenile 105 justice programs, special programs, adult education programs, 106 and career education programs. Additionally, district school 107 boards must: 108 (1)âProvide for the proper accounting for all students of 109 school age, for the attendance and control of students at 110 school, and for proper attention to health, safety, and other 111 matters relating to the welfare of students in the following 112 areas: 113 (b)âEnforcement of attendance laws.âProvide for the 114 enforcement of all laws and rules relating to the attendance of 115 students at school. District school boards are authorized to 116 establish policies that allow accumulated unexcused tardies, 117 regardless of when they occur during the school day, and early 118 departures from school to be recorded as unexcused absences. 119 District school boards are also authorized to establish policies 120 that require referral to a schoolâs child study team for 121 students who have fewer absences than the number required by s. 122 1003.26(1)(c) s. 1003.26(1)(b). 123 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.